District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.01

Establishment of the Department of Transportation.

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council establishes the District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) as an agency within the executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia to improve the District’s economic competitiveness and quality of life by planning, coordinating, and operating the transportation system, including the DC Circulator pursuant to subchapter II of this chapter and the DC Streetcar, and managing and maintaining the transportation infrastructure, to ensure the safe, efficient movement of people, goods and information along public rights-of-way.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 2, 49 DCR 3444
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 20(a), 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 77(a), 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(c), 53 DCR 10232
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-339, § 6(a), 58 DCR 618
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “District Department of Transportation (’DDOT’)” for “Department of Transportation (’DOT’)”.
D.C. Law 16-225, substituted “coordinating, and operating the transportation system, including the DC Circulator pursuant to subchapter II of this chapter” for “and coordinating the transportation system”.
D.C. Law 18-339 substituted “subchapter II of this chapter and the DC Streetcar,” for “subchapter II of this chapter,”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-134, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5762).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-321, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2557).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).
For temporary (90 days) allocation of traffic control officers, see §§ 6102 and 6103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) allocation of traffic control officers, see §§ 6102 and 6103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 6101 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle K of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “Allocation of Traffic Control Officers Act of 2013”.

Section 6102 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided: “Safety justification. The District Department of Transportation (‘DDOT’) shall:

“(1) Justify the placement of Traffic Control Officers (‘TCOs’) at intersections based on safety, except when needed to manage special events or construction sites or when safety concerns for TCOs exist; and

“(2) Prioritize placement of TCOs at the 10 most dangerous intersections during peak hazardous times.”

Section 6103 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided: “Public notification of safety justification and dangerous intersections. On or before February 1, 2014, DDOT shall publish on its website:

“(1) A standard safety justification for the placement of TCOs; and

“(2) A list of the 10 most dangerous intersections that will have TCOs during the most hazardous times of day, and the corresponding justification for these placements.”